New York, session 2025-2026, S1804.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (i) of section 3216 of the insurance law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph 41 to read as follows: 3 (41) (A) Every policy which provides medical, major medical or similar 4 comprehensive-type coverage and provides coverage for prescription drugs 5 shall include coverage for inhalers for the treatment of asthma if 6 prescribed by a physician or other licensed health care provider legally 7 authorized to prescribe under title eight of the education law. 8 (B) Coverage shall be provided for one form of rescue and one form of 9 maintenance inhaler that shall not be subject to a deductible, copay- 10 ment, coinsurance or any other cost-sharing requirement. 11 (C) If the policy is a high deductible health plan as defined in 12 section 223(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, such coverage 13 may be subject to the plan's annual deductible if application of this 14 requirement would result in ineligibility for a health savings account. 15 § 2. Subsection (l) of section 3221 of the insurance law is amended by 16 adding a new paragraph 23 to read as follows: 17 (23) (A) Every group or blanket accident and health insurance policy 18 issued or issued for delivery in this state which provides medical, 19 major medical or similar comprehensive-type coverage and provides cover- 20 age for prescription drugs shall include coverage for inhalers for the 21 treatment of asthma if prescribed by a physician or other licensed 22 health care provider legally authorized to prescribe under title eight 23 of the education law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00983-05-5 S. 1804--A 2 1 (B) Coverage shall be provided for one form of rescue and one form of 2 maintenance inhaler that shall not be subject to a deductible, copay- 3 ment, coinsurance or any other cost-sharing requirement. 4 (C) If the policy is a high deductible health plan as defined in 5 section 223(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, such coverage 6 may be subject to the plan's annual deductible if application of this 7 requirement would result in ineligibility for a health savings account. 8 § 3. Section 4303 of the insurance law is amended by adding a new 9 subsection (ww) to read as follows: 10 (ww) (1) A medical expense indemnity corporation or a health service 11 corporation which provides medical, major medical or similar comprehen- 12 sive-type coverage and provides coverage for prescription drugs shall 13 include coverage for inhalers for the treatment of asthma if prescribed 14 by a physician or other licensed health care provider legally authorized 15 to prescribe under title eight of the education law. 16 (2) Coverage shall be provided for one form of rescue and one form of 17 maintenance inhaler that shall not be subject to a deductible, copay- 18 ment, coinsurance or any other cost-sharing requirement. 19 (3) If the policy is a high deductible health plan as defined in 20 section 223(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, such coverage 21 may be subject to the plan's annual deductible if application of this 22 requirement would result in ineligibility for a health savings account. 23 § 4. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027 and shall apply to all 24 policies and contracts issued, renewed, modified, altered, or amended on 25 or after such date.